Mississippi, session 2026, HB1535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 77-19-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-19-3.  As used in this chapter: (a)  "Applicant" means an eligible broadband service provider that has authorization to do business in this state and has demonstrated that it has the technical, financial and managerial resources and experience to provide broadband services in the state to retail end users. (b)  "Broadband service" means a mass-market retail service by wire, cable, fiber, or radio provided to customers in the State of Mississippi that provides the capability to transmit data to, and receive data from, all or substantially all Internet endpoints, at speeds of at least one hundred (100) megabits per second downstream and twenty (20) megabits per second upstream, and including, but not limited to, any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the operation of communications service, but excluding dial-up Internet access service. (c)  "Office" means the Office of Broadband Expansion and Accessibility of Mississippi (BEAM) within the Department of Finance and Administration created in Section 77-19-5. (d)  "Deployed" means, with respect to availability of broadband service at a location, when the person or entity has access regardless of whether a person or entity subscribes to the broadband service at the location. (e)  "Eligible broadband service provider" means any company, firm, corporation, limited liability company, partnership or association (i) that has been providing broadband service to at least one hundred (100) residences and businesses in Mississippi for at least three (3) consecutive years; (ii) is an electric power association's broadband affiliate operating pursuant to Section 77-17-1 et seq.; or (iii) that has demonstrated financial, technical, and operational capability in building and operating a broadband network. (f)  "Eligible project" means a * * *discrete and specific project located in * * *an unserved or underserved area of the state seeking to provide broadband services to residences, businesses, and/or community institutions * * *not currently available for service in accordance with the applicable federal * * *guidelines grant program's statutes, regulations, and guidance. * * *(g)  "Shapefile" means a digital storage format containing geospatial or location‑based data and attribute information regarding the availability of broadband Internet access service, and that can be viewed, edited, and mapped in geographic information system software. SECTION 2.  Section 77-19-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-19-15.  (1)  An applicant for funding under this chapter shall provide the following information at a minimum on the application: (a)  The location of the project * * *by use of a shapefile in a format as required by BEAM; (b)  The type and amount of broadband infrastructure to be deployed for the project, including the amount the applicant intends to invest in the project from private funds; (c)  Evidence regarding the unserved or underserved nature of the community in which the project is to be located; (d)  The number of households that will have access to broadband service as a result of the project, or whose Internet access service will be upgraded to broadband service as a result of the project; (e)  The significant community institutions that will benefit from the proposed project; (f)  Evidence of community support for the project with a narrative on the impact that the investment will have on community and economic development efforts in the area; (g)  The total cost of the project and a detailed budget and schedule for the project, including the submission of a business plan that provides for the use of funds provided under this chapter.  Funds shall not be used to support the operational expenses of the network or to subsidize any other service provided by the applicant; and (h)  The broadband service provider's experience and financial capabilities. (2)  After scoring and considering all applications, the Office of Broadband Expansion and Accessibility of Mississippi (BEAM) shall make its preliminary determinations. Within thirty (30) days after the preliminary determinations have been made, BEAM shall publish on its website the applications, the proposed geographic broadband service area * * *illustrated by a shapefile, and the proposed broadband service speeds for each application that receives a preliminary determination. (3)  Within thirty (30) days from the date the preliminary determinations are published on BEAM's website, BEAM shall accept comments or objections concerning each application and investigate each of them as appropriate.  BEAM shall consider all comments and objections received and the investigative findings in determining whether an applicant is eligible for a final determination and award. (4)  BEAM shall not make a final determination and award to an applicant if verifiable information is made available that shows the proposed project includes an area where broadband services currently are deployed by a provider other than the applicant, or where construction of a network to deploy broadband service is underway by a provider other than the applicant, and the construction is scheduled to be completed within one (1) year after the date of the application. (5)  An applicant's or challenging party's trade secrets, financial information and proprietary information submitted under this chapter as part of an application or challenge are exempt from disclosure under the Mississippi Public Records Act, Section 25-61-1 et seq. (6)  Any contractor deploying broadband infrastructure for a project that has been awarded grant monies by BEAM is encouraged to use Mississippi employment to the fullest extent possible. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.